Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.222, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Alternative wetland mitigation; greater than 80 percent areas. new text end new text begin (a) For wetland replacement in greater than 80 percent areas, the minimum wetland replacement ratio may be reduced to ... for replacement outside the service bank area or major watershed if the public value of the wetlands is replaced with alternative wetland mitigation strategies completed within the service bank area or major watershed that create at least ... of the public value of the wetlands impacted. For the purposes of this subdivision, alternative wetland mitigation includes: new text end new text begin (1) restoration or protection of riparian corridors or streams; new text end new text begin (2) hydrologic stabilization of altered waterways; new text end new text begin (3) peatland hydrology restoration; and new text end new text begin (4) completion of a water quality or other environmental improvement project contained in a comprehensive plan, local water management plan, or watershed management plan approved and adopted according to chapter 103B, 103C, or 103D, or a comprehensive watershed management plan as defined under section 103B.3363, subdivision 3a. new text end new text begin (b) The board, in consultation with the commissioner of agriculture and local government units, must adopt rules to implement this subdivision, including establishing methods for determining the public value of alternative wetland mitigation. new text end